Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-110] Loss ratio standards;
factors; commissioner approval. The commissioner may adopt rules
establishing loss ratio standards for long-term care insurance policies;
provided that a specific reference to long-term care insurance policies is contained
in the rule. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next